New Jersey, session 221, S4578.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Within one year from the effective date of this act, the department shall ensure that prescribed burns occur annually in the pinelands area, as defined pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-3), and on additional acreage Statewide.  The minimum acreage of the prescribed burns shall be: (1)   for the first year of prescribed burns, 25,000 acres in the pinelands area and 10,000 additional acres Statewide; (2)   for the second year of prescribed burns, 30,000 acres in the pinelands area and 12,000 additional acres Statewide; (3)   for the third year of prescribed burns, 35,000 acres in the pinelands area and 14,000 additional acres Statewide; (4)   for the fourth year of prescribed burns, 40,000 acres in the pinelands area and 16,000 additional acres Statewide; (5)   for the fifth year of prescribed burns, 45,000 acres in the pinelands area and 18,000 additional acres Statewide; (6)   for the sixth and each subsequent year of prescribed burns, 50,000 acres in the pinelands area and 20,000 additional acres Statewide; b.  The prescribed burns may be conducted by the department, the federal government, or by landowners or lessees pursuant to the Prescribed Burn Act, P.L.2018, c.107 (C.13:9-44.11 et seq.). c.  The department shall require that all prescribed burns in the State be conducted and completed between the months of November and March prior to the wildfire season in New Jersey. d.  The department, in conjunction with the Department of Agriculture, the Highlands Water Protection and Planning Council, the Pinelands Commission, the State Planning Commission, and any other relevant State entity, shall incorporate the requirements of subsections a. and b. of this section into all applicable environmental and land management plans, programs, and surveys, and any updates thereto. 2.  This act shall take effect immediately.